Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3609
Maps; review by county board; notice.

The county board shall review the maps delineating the areas of future growth and development received from each city and village and shall identify those portions of the county which two or more cities or villages claim as being within each of their respective areas of future growth and development. Within fifteen days after the date upon which the last map was filed pursuant to section 23-3607, the county board shall notify the cities or villages that are claiming overlapping portions of areas of future growth and development of the territory which is the subject of dispute and of the other cities or villages claiming the same territory within their areas of future growth and development. The notice shall state the location, date, and time when the county board will hold a public hearing for all interested parties on the question of which city or village should properly be permitted to include the disputed territory within its defined area of future growth and development. Such notice shall be delivered at least twenty days prior to the public hearing.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 9.